Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB995.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(b) of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended to read:Section 302. Prize limits.* * *(b) Aggregate prize limit.--No more than [$35,000] $60,000 in prizes shall be awarded from games of chance by a licensed eligible organization in any seven-day period.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718192021